Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
578

ADOPTION

Section

578-1 Who may adopt; jurisdiction; venue

578-1.5 Adoption

578-2 Consent to adoption

578-3 Custody of child pendente lite

578-4 Notice to resident nonconsenting legal
parent whose

rights have not been terminated

578-5 Same; proof of

578-6 Notice to nonresident or unlocated
nonconsenting

legal parent whose rights have not been
terminated

578-7 Substituted or constructive service

578-8 Hearing; investigation; decree

578-9 Custody of minor child after decree and
before

adoption

578-10 Disposition of minor child on
discontinuance,

withdrawal or denial of petition

578-11 Disposition in case of death of
petitioners

578-12 Setting aside or modifying decree

578-13 Change of name

578-14 Record of adoption

578-14.5 Medical information on the natural parents
of the

adopted minor child

578-15 Secrecy of proceedings and records

578-16 Effect of adoption

578-17 Guardian ad litem

Cross References

Adoption assistance compact, see chapter 350C.

Adoption assistance program, see §§346-301 to 305.

Interstate compact on placement of children, see chapter
350E.

Medicaid-related mandates, see chapter 431L.

Attorney General Opinions

Rights attendant to status of adoption require compliance
with statutory procedures; rights of hanai children discussed. Att. Gen. Op.
93-1.

Law Journals and Reviews

Privacy v. Secrecy: The Open Adoption Records Movement and
Its Impact on Hawai‘i. 15 UH L. Rev. 483.

The "Hawaiianness" of Same-Sex Adoption. 30 UH L.
Rev. 517 (2008).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next